Utah statutes.
70C-2-207.   Referral sales.
With respect to a consumer credit sale, the seller may not give or offer to
give a rebate or discount or otherwise pay or offer to pay value to the buyer
as an inducement for a sale in consideration of his giving to the seller the
names of prospective purchasers or otherwise aiding the seller in making a
sale to another person, if the earning of the rebate, discount, or other value
is contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time the buyer
agrees to buy.  If a buyer is induced by a violation of this section to enter
into a consumer credit sale, the agreement is unenforceable by the seller and
the buyer may rescind the agreement and retain any goods delivered until all
payments made by the debtor have been fully refunded to him.  The buyer may
retain the benefit of any services performed without any obligation to pay for
them.  This section does not apply if any goods delivered to the buyer are
damaged while in the buyer's possession or are not delivered to the seller at
the buyer's residence, or at any other place agreed on by the parties, within
a reasonable time after the seller tenders or delivers a full refund of all
payments to the buyer.
